Hawaii, session 2026, HB2588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a growing shortage of qualified American Sign Language interpreters.  The 2024 report to the legislature entitled Assessment of American Sign Language Interpreting Services and the Interpreter Shortage in Hawaii, submitted by the Department of Health, Disability and Communication Access Board recommended establishing an American Sign Language interpreter training program within the university of Hawaii system. The legislature further finds that while there are over two hundred certificate, associate, bachelor, and graduate level interpreter training programs nationwide, Hawaii is one of only eight states which does not have an interpreter training program. The legislature believes that establishing a bachelor of arts degree in sign language interpretation program with a multi-year plan to include a master's program will eliminate the shortage of American Sign Language interpreters, and provide an academic and career path for state residents to become skilled professionals. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the establishment of a bachelor of arts degree in sign language interpretation with a multi-year plan to include a master's program at the university of Hawaii at Manoa. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $140,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to: (1)  Establish a bachelor of arts degree in sign language interpretation at the university of Hawaii at Manoa campus; (2)  Develop a multi-year plan to include a master's degree in sign language interpretation; (3)  Fund additional personnel associated with the establishment of the interpreter training program; and (4)  Purchase related supplies and equipment. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________